Washington statutes.
RCW 39.10.420

Job order procedure—Public bodies may authorize and use.

(1) All public bodies of the state of Washington are authorized to award job order contracts and use the job order contracting procedure.

(2)(a) The department of enterprise services may issue job order contract work orders for Washington state parks department projects and public hospital districts.

(b) The department of enterprise services, the University of Washington, and Washington State University may issue job order contract work orders for the state regional universities and The Evergreen State College.

(3) Public bodies may use a job order contract for public works projects when a determination is made that the use of job order contracts will benefit the public by providing an effective means of reducing the total lead-time and cost for the construction of public works projects for repair and renovation required at public facilities through the use of unit price books and work orders by eliminating time-consuming, costly aspects of the traditional public works process, which require separate contracting actions for each small project.

[ 2019 c 212 s 7; 2017 c 136 s 1; 2016 c 52 s 1. Prior: 2013 c 222 s 18; 2013 c 186 s 1; 2012 c 102 s 1; 2009 c 75 s 7; 2007 c 494 s 401; 2003 c 301 s 1. Formerly RCW 39.10.130.]

NOTES:

Sunset Act application: See note following chapter digest.

Effective date—2013 c 222: See note following RCW 39.10.210.